New York, session 2025-2026, A9056.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph 3 of paragraph b of subdivision 3 of section 2 22 of the executive law, as amended by section 3 of part B of chapter 56 3 of the laws of 2010, is amended to read as follows: 4 (3) a system for warning populations who are or may be endangered. Any 5 emergency alert issued through e-mail, text, phone, social media plat- 6 form, or internet-based feed shall be issued in no fewer than the ten 7 most commonly spoken languages within the area covered by such emergency 8 alert. Such notifications shall be separated into distinct messages in 9 separate feeds for each language. A general version of each notification 10 may be used when a real-time translation is unavailable, provided that 11 priority shall be placed upon making notifications available with the 12 greatest specificity possible; 13 § 2. Section 30-115 of the administrative code of the city of New 14 York, as added by local law number 31 of the city of New York for the 15 year 2017, is amended to read as follows: 16 § 30-115 Emergency notifications. a. Any emergency alert originated by 17 a city office or city agency that is issued through a commercial mobile 18 service alert system established pursuant to section 1201 of title 47 of 19 the United States code shall, to the extent practicable and to the 20 extent permissible under regulations enacted pursuant to such section, 21 be issued in no fewer than the [two] ten most commonly spoken languages 22 within the area covered by the emergency alert as determined by the 23 commissioner in consultation with the department of city planning, EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13630-01-5 A. 9056 2 1 provided that this subdivision does not require the issuance of an emer- 2 gency alert in a language if exigent circumstances prohibit the issuance 3 of an alert in such language. 4 b. Any emergency notification system operated and controlled by the 5 office of emergency management for the purposes of aggregating informa- 6 tion obtained from other offices or agencies to inform the public about 7 emergencies or disruptive events through e-mail, text, phone, social 8 media platform, or internet-based feed shall offer each notification in 9 no fewer than the [seven] ten most commonly spoken languages within the 10 city as determined by the commissioner in consultation with the depart- 11 ment of city planning, provided that this requirement shall not delay or 12 prohibit the immediate issuance of notifications in any individual 13 language. Notifications shall be separated into distinct messages in 14 separate feeds for each language. A general version of each notification 15 may be used when a real-time translation is unavailable, provided that 16 priority shall be placed upon making notifications available with the 17 greatest specificity possible. Any dissemination limitation applicable 18 to an English language notification may be applied to its equivalent 19 notification in another language. If no potential recipient is regis- 20 tered for a specific language, then a notification need not be dissem- 21 inated in that language. 22 § 3. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 23 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment 24 and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation 25 of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 26 completed on or before such effective date.